Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1226
Failure to report theft of explosives; penalty.

(1) Any person who has knowledge of the theft or loss of explosive materials from his or her stock who fails to report such theft or loss within twenty-four hours of discovery to the Nebraska State Patrol commits the offense of failure to report theft of explosives.

(2) Failure to report theft of explosives is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 258;

Laws 1989, LB 215, § 7.